Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 1 General Provisions
63-1-121. Enjoining violations.

The division, in addition to the powers and duties expressed in this chapter with respect to the denial of a license, denial of certificate of registration and suspension or revocation of a license, is empowered to petition any circuit or chancery court having jurisdiction of any person within this state who is practicing without a license or to whom a license has been denied, or to whom a certificate of registration has been denied or whose license has been suspended or revoked by action of the division, to enjoin such person from continuing to practice the healing arts, or any branch thereof, within this state.

Jurisdiction is conferred upon the circuit and chancery courts of this state to hear and determine all such causes as equity causes and exercise full and complete jurisdiction in such injunctive proceedings; but nothing in this section shall be construed as conferring criminal jurisdiction upon any court not now possessing such criminal jurisdiction, nor shall any such court, as an incident to the injunctive proceedings authorized in this section, have the power to assess the criminal penalties set out in this chapter.

Acts 1947, ch. 9, § 12; C. Supp. 1950, § 6907.12 (Williams, § 6917.29); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-125; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 77; T.C.A., § 63-1-125.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-1-121 (Acts 1947, ch. 9, § 15; C. Supp. 1950, § 6907.15 (Williams, § 6917.32); Acts 1953, ch. 113, § 8; 1976, ch. 806, § 1 (99); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-121), concerning compensation of board members and payment of expenses, was repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 73.

63-1-122. Standard of care.

For purposes of any action before any board, committee, council, or other agency created pursuant to this title or title 68, in which the standard of care is at issue, members of such a board, committee, council, or agency are entitled to rely upon their own expertise in making determinations concerning the standard of care and are not subject to voir dire concerning such expertise. The standard of care for such actions is a statewide standard of minimal competency and practice; provided, however, that to sustain actions based upon a violation of this standard of care, the board, committee, council, or other agency must, absent admissions or other testimony to the effect that the standard of care was violated, articulate the standard of care in its deliberations. The provisions of title 29, chapter 26, and specifically § 29-26-115(a), concerning the locality rule, do not apply to actions taken pursuant to this title or title 68.

Acts 2017, ch. 240, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-1-122 (Acts 1947, ch. 9, § 10; C. Supp. 1950, § 6907.10 (Williams, § 6917.27); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-122; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 74; T.C.A. § 63-1-122), concerning the enforcement of regulatory laws designed to prevent unlawful practices of the healing arts, was repealed by Acts 2010, ch. 1043, § 5, effective June 11, 2010.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 240, § 6. May 2, 2017.

63-1-123. Penalties.

Any person, except those expressly exempted from this chapter by § 63-1-110 or § 63-1-111 who practices the healing arts as defined in this chapter, or any branch thereof, without first complying with this chapter, including all laws now in force regulating the practice of the various branches of the healing arts, and any person who violates this chapter commits a Class B misdemeanor.

Each time any person practices the healing arts, or any branch thereof, without meeting all the requirements of laws now in force and of this chapter constitutes a separate offense. Any person filing or attempting to file as that person's own a diploma or license of another or a forged affidavit of identification commits a felony and is subject to the punishment prescribed by law for the crime of forgery.

Acts 1947, ch. 9, § 13; C. Supp. 1950, § 6907.13 (Williams, § 6917.30); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-126; T.C.A. § 63-1-126; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 112.

Cross-References. Forgery, §§ 39-14-114, 39-14-115.

Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

63-1-124. Citizen member.

The governor shall appoint one (1) citizen member to each health-related board that does not have a citizen as a part of its membership. The term of each such citizen member shall be the same as other members of the respective board to which such person is appointed. As used in this section, “citizen member” means a person who is appointed to serve on a board and who does not engage in any profession, business or activity subject to regulation by the board.

Acts 1993, ch. 181, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-1-124 (Acts 1947, ch. 9, § 11; C. Supp. 1950, § 6907.11 (Williams, § 6917.28); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-124), concerning procedure for suspension or revocation, and judicial review, was repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 76.

63-1-125. Kenneth and Madge Tullis, MD, Suicide Prevention Training Act.

This section shall be known and may be cited as the “Kenneth and Madge Tullis, MD, Suicide Prevention Training Act.”

As used in this section:

“Board” means a health-related board created in this title or title 68 and includes the:

Board for professional counselors, marital and family therapists, and clinical pastoral therapists, created by § 63-22-101;

Board of social work licensure, created by § 63-23-101;

Board of alcohol and drug abuse counselors, created by § 68-24-601; and

Board of occupational therapy, created by § 63-13-216; and

“Training program” means an empirically supported training program that covers the following elements:

Suicide prevention;

Suicide assessment and screening;

Suicide treatment;

Suicide management; and

Suicide postvention.

The department of mental health and substance abuse services shall:

Develop, in collaboration with the Tennessee Suicide Prevention Network, a model list of training programs;

When developing the model list, consider training programs of at least two (2) hours in length that are based on expert consensus and adhere to high standards of suicide prevention;

When developing the model list, consult with the boards; public and private institutions of higher education; experts in suicide prevention, assessment, treatment, management, and postvention; and affected professional associations; and

Report, in collaboration with the Tennessee Suicide Prevention Network, the model list of training programs to the department of health no later than December 15, 2017.

A board may approve a training program that excludes an element described in the definition of training program if the element is inappropriate for the profession in question or inappropriate for the level of licensure or credentialing of that profession based on the profession's scope of practice.

Beginning January 1, 2020, each of the following professionals certified or licensed under this title or title 68 shall, at least once every four (4) years, complete a training program that is approved by rule by the respective boards:

A social worker licensed under chapter 23 of this title;

A marriage and family therapist, professional counselor, or pastoral counselor certified or licensed under chapter 22 of this title;

An alcohol and drug abuse counselor certified under title 68, chapter 24; and

An occupational therapist licensed under chapter 13 of this title.

A professional listed in subsection (e) applying for initial licensure or certification on or after January 1, 2020, is not required to complete the training program required by this section for two (2) years after initial licensure or certification if the professional can demonstrate successful completion of a two-hour academic training program that meets criteria established by the profession's board and that was completed no more than two (2) years prior to the application for initial licensure or certification.

The hours spent completing the training program under this section count toward meeting any applicable continuing education requirements for each profession.

Nothing in this section expands or limits the scope of practice of any profession regulated under this title or title 68.

Acts 2017, ch. 396, § 1; 2019, ch. 131, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2017, ch. 396, § 1 enacted this section as § 63-1-122 but the section has been redesignated as § 63-1-125 by the authority of the code commission.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2017, ch. 396, § 2, which enacted this section, provided that the department of health, the department of mental health and substance abuse services, and each board that governs professionals subject to the act are authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this act. All rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 5.

For the Preamble to the act concerning training health professionals in suicide prevention, please refer to Acts 2017, ch. 396.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “at least once every four (4) years,” for “at least once every five (5) years,” in (e).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 396, § 3. May 18, 2017.

Acts 2019, ch. 131, § 2. April 9, 2019.

63-1-126. Refusal to submit to drug test or testing positive for any drug violation of practitioner's practice act.

As used in this section:

“Confirmed drug test” means a confirmed test as defined in § 50-9-103;

“Drug” means a drug as defined in § 50-9-103;

“Employer” means a covered employer, as defined in § 50-9-103, that is a healthcare facility licensed under title 68, chapter 11, part 2, or any other healthcare employer that employs healthcare practitioners; and

“Healthcare practitioner” or “practitioner” means any person required to be licensed, permitted, certified, or authorized:

Under this title by a board or committee under the division of health-related boards specified in § 68-1-101(a)(8), who has humans for patients; or

Under title 68, chapter 24, part 6; or

Under title 68, chapter 140.

A healthcare practitioner violates the practitioner's practice act by refusing to submit to a drug test or testing positive for any drug on any government or private sector preemployment or employer-ordered confirmed drug test for an employer when the practitioner does not have a lawful prescription for using the drug or a valid medical reason for using the drug.

If a healthcare practitioner refuses to submit to a drug test or tests positive for any drug on any government or private sector preemployment or employer-ordered confirmed drug test for a covered employer, then this section shall apply to the practitioner.

The practitioner shall be given three (3) business days from the time of notification to the practitioner of the confirmed test result to:

Produce a lawful prescription for the drug or a valid medical reason for using the drug to the employer; or

Report to the substance abuse peer assistance or treatment program of the appropriate board for the practitioner.

So long as the practitioner obtains and maintains the advocacy of the substance abuse peer assistance or treatment program, unless otherwise required by law, the employer is not required to notify the appropriate board for the practitioner of the violation of the practitioner's practice act.

Whenever a healthcare practitioner who has been referred by the practitioner's employer or who has self-reported to the substance abuse peer assistance or treatment program of the appropriate board pursuant to subdivision (c)(1) fails to obtain or maintain the advocacy of the program, the program shall report the practitioner to the appropriate board concerning the violation of the practitioner's practice act.

So long as the practitioner complies with the terms and conditions of a referral to a substance abuse peer assistance or treatment program, the practitioner's license or certificate shall not be suspended or revoked by the appropriate board for a positive result on a confirmed drug test or a refusal to submit to a drug test.

The board shall suspend the license, certificate, permit, or authorization of a healthcare practitioner who has been referred to the substance abuse peer assistance or treatment program pursuant to this subsection (c) when the practitioner fails to comply with the terms and conditions of the program.

The board is not prohibited from taking any other disciplinary action authorized by law for conduct other than a positive result on a confirmed drug test or a refusal to submit to a drug test.

A substance abuse peer assistance or treatment program shall promptly report any failure of a practitioner who has reported to the program pursuant to this subsection (c) to maintain compliance with the terms and conditions of the program to the appropriate licensing board.

Any drug test used for action pursuant to this section shall comply with the requirements of title 50, chapter 9. The employer of the healthcare practitioner shall promptly report, as determined by rule and subject to subsection (c), a practitioner who tests positive for any drug on a confirmed drug test, or who refuses to submit to a drug test, to the department.

The commissioner of health is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this section. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2017, ch. 481, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-1-126 was transferred to § 63-1-123 in 1986.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 481, § 5. July 1, 2017.

63-1-127. Sharing of information concerning substance abuse by healthcare practitioner with other quality improvement committees.

A quality improvement committee, as defined in § 63-1-150, may share information concerning substance abuse by a healthcare practitioner licensed or certified under this title with another quality improvement committee pursuant to § 63-1-150(d)(3) or § 68-11-272(c)(3) in furtherance of the functions of the committees.

Acts 2017, ch. 481, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-1-127 was transferred to § 63-1-115 in 1986.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 481, § 5. July 1, 2017.

63-1-128. Emergency action not requiring prior approval of attorney general and reporter.

Notwithstanding any law, rule, or policy of a board or the department of health, emergency action by the department or the board under § 4-5-320(c) shall not require the prior approval of the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 2017, ch. 481, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-1-128 was transferred to § 63-1-116 in 1986.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 481, § 5. July 1, 2017.

63-1-129. Solicitation of accident and disaster victims by health care prescribers prohibited — Exceptions.

Health care prescribers, their employees, agents, or independent contractors shall not conduct in-person solicitation, telemarketing, or telephonic solicitation of victims of an accident or disaster, for the purpose of marketing services of the healing arts related to the accident or disaster, unless:

The health care prescriber has a family or prior professional relationship with the victim; or

The solicitation is carried out more than thirty (30) days after the date of the accident or disaster.

Health care prescribers shall maintain:

Telemarketing transcripts for a period of two (2) years following their utilization; and

A log of contacts for a period of two (2) years following a telemarketing encounter.

This section does not prohibit solicitation by targeted direct-mail advertising or other forms of written, radio, or television advertising, as long as the advertising does not involve coercion, duress, or harassment and is not false, deceptive, or misleading.

Any agreement to pay a health care prescriber for services that were rendered by the health care prescriber as a direct result of a violation of this section is void and unenforceable. No person may collect or pursue collection for any debt arising from such an agreement.

A patient or person who paid on behalf of a patient is entitled to a complete refund of any money paid for services that were rendered by a health care prescriber as a direct result of a violation of this section.

The division is authorized to petition any circuit or chancery court having jurisdiction to enjoin any person who is violating this section. No injunction bond shall be required of the division in such proceedings, and jurisdiction is conferred upon the circuit and chancery courts of this state to hear such cases.

Acts 2018, ch. 638, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-1-129 (Acts 1980, ch. 851, §§ 7, 12; 1980, ch. 858, § 2; T.C.A., § 63-129), concerning nurse practitioners, was repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 80.

Acts 2018, ch. 638, § 2 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall apply to violations occurring on or after July 1, 2018.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 638, § 2. July 1, 2018.

63-1-130. Denial of license for prior criminal prosecution prohibited.

As used in this section, “licensing authority” means any state department, board, commission, or agency that issues any license, certificate, or registration for an individual to engage in an occupation, profession, business, or trade in this state, including to those licensing authorities that have statutory authority to deny, suspend, or revoke a license for felonies or misdemeanors of moral turpitude.

Subject to the exemptions in this section and unless prohibited by federal law, a licensing authority shall not deny an application for a license, certificate, or registration, or refuse to renew a license, certificate, or registration due to a prior criminal conviction that does not directly relate to the applicable occupation, profession, business, or trade.

Prior to denying an application for a license, certificate, or registration on the basis of a criminal conviction, or prior to the refusal to renew a license, certificate, or registration on the basis of a criminal conviction, the licensing authority shall notify the applicant, licensee, certificate holder, or registrant of the licensing authority's determination in writing via certified mail, facsimile transmission, or email. The written notification shall include the licensing authority's justification for denial or refusal to renew in accordance to subdivision (b)(4)(A). The determination must state the earliest date upon which the applicant is eligible to reapply for the license, certificate, or registration.

Prior to submitting the application necessary to obtain a license, certification, or registration an individual may request written notice from the licensing authority from which they seek to obtain a license, certification, or registration concerning the individual's qualification to obtain the license, certificate, or registration, based on the individual's criminal history. If the licensing authority determines that an individual is disqualified due to the individual's criminal history, the licensing authority must provide the individual with a written notification that sets forth the reasons for its determination and its justification in accordance with subdivision (b)(4)(A). The written notice as to the individual's qualifications to obtain a license, certificate, or registration must be limited to the individual's criminal history and should not be construed as prohibiting the licensing authority from denying an application on other grounds. This determination shall apply exclusively to the individual and shall not be construed as an advisory or formal opinion of the licensing authority.

In considering whether to deny an application for a license, certificate, or registration to an applicant, or whether to refuse to renew a license, certificate, or registration, on the basis of a criminal conviction, the licensing authority must consider:

The nature and seriousness of the crime for which the individual was convicted;

The length of time since the commission of the crime;

The relationship between the nature of the crime and the purposes of regulating the occupation, profession, business, or trade for which the license, certificate, or registration is sought;

The relationship between the crime and the ability, capacity, and fitness required to perform the duties and discharge the responsibilities of the occupation, profession, business, or trade;

Any evidence of rehabilitation or treatment undertaken by the individual that might mitigate against the relationship of crime to the occupation, profession, business, or trade; and

Any applicable federal laws regarding an individual's participation in the occupation, profession, business, or trade.

If an applicant, licensee, certificate holder, or registrant's prior conviction was for a Class A felony, Class B felony, or Class C felony not defined under title 39, chapter 17, part 4, or if the felony conviction is for an offense for which the offender is required to register under the Tennessee Animal Abuser Registration Act, compiled in title 40, chapter 39, part 1; the Tennessee Sexual Offender and Violent Sexual Offender Registration, Verification and Tracking Act of 2004, compiled in title 40, chapter 39, part 2; or title 40, chapter 39, part 3, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that the conviction relates to the fitness of the applicant, licensee, certificate holder, or registrant engaged in the applicable occupation, profession, business, or trade.

An individual, applicant, licensee, certificate holder, or registrant who receives written notice pursuant to subdivision (b)(2) or (b)(3) may file a petition within thirty (30) business days of the receipt of the notice in Davidson County chancery court. The licensing authority must demonstrate by a preponderance of the evidence that the individual, applicant, licensee, certificate holder, or registrant's conviction is related to the applicable occupation, profession, business, or trade.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a licensing authority created by this title from issuing a restricted or conditional license, if otherwise authorized to do so under law.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to create a separate right to a contested case hearing that does not otherwise exist relative to the denial of the license, certificate, or registration under the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Nothing in this section applies to:

The board of law examiners, created under § 23-1-101;

The board of judicial conduct, created under § 17-5-201;

The licensure of services and facilities operated pursuant to title 33, chapter 2, part 4, for the provision of mental health services, alcohol, and drug abuse prevention or treatment; for the provision of services for intellectual and developmental disabilities; and for personal support services;

The certification of police officers under title 38, chapter 8;

Any licensing authority created under titles 41, 48, 49, 56, and 71;

The department of financial institutions, when acting as a licensing authority pursuant to title 45;

Any license, certificate, or registration issued pursuant to the rules of the supreme court;

The licensure of pain management clinics licensed pursuant to chapter 1, part 3 of this title; and

The licensure of physicians under chapter 6 or 9 of this title.

Acts 2018, ch. 793, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 793, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Fresh Start Act.”

Former § 63-1-130 was transferred to § 63-1-117 in 1986.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 793, § 4. July 1, 2018.

63-1-131. Director — Appointment.

The commissioner of health shall appoint a director of the division of health related boards provided for in this section and §§ 63-1-132, 63-1-133, and 68-1-101.

Acts 1971, ch. 81, § 5; T.C.A., §§ 53-121, 68-1-601; Acts 2010, ch. 1043, § 6.

63-1-132. Director — Powers and duties.

The director of the division of health related boards has the power, duty, and responsibility to:

Employ all staff assigned or performing duties for the agencies attached to the division;

Promulgate rules and regulations for all administrative functions and activities of the agencies attached to the division as well as all matters that affect more than one (1) of the agencies attached to the division with the approval of the agencies affected. In cases where multiple agencies are authorized to promulgate similar rules that apply to each of the agencies, the director is authorized to hold one (1) public rulemaking hearing and promulgate a single rule or a single chapter of rules, but only after receiving prior approval of the agencies affected;

Employ, with the consent of the regulatory board concerned, all executive directors and consultants; the director may employ all other personnel necessary to carry out the function of all of the agencies attached to the division;

Maintain a central filing system for official records and documents of all agencies attached to the division;

Provide office space and necessary quarters for the agencies attached to the division;

Assign personnel to staff such agencies in order to ensure the most efficient use of personnel; and

Perform such other duties as the commissioner may prescribe, or as may be prescribed by law.

Any employment of personnel or consultants by the division shall be in accordance with the rules, regulations and standards of the departments of human resources and finance and administration.

Acts 1971, ch. 81, § 6; T.C.A., § 53-122; Acts 1985, ch. 120, § 16; T.C.A., § 68-1-602; Acts 1994, ch. 569, § 1; 1996, ch. 659, § 1; 1996, ch. 754, § 3; 2010, ch. 1043, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1996, ch. 754, § 3 purported to insert “or § 63-9-113” following “§ 63-6-204” near the middle of (c); however, as rewritten by Acts 1996, ch. 659, “§ 63-6-204” does not appear in (c). The amendment by ch. 754 is therefore deemed to be of no effect.

Attorney General Opinions. The division of health related boards of the Tennessee department of health does not have authority, absent specific legislation, to use screening panels for the various boards to assist with the processing and disposition of disciplinary cases, OAG 01-055, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 47 (4/10/01).

Hiring of executive director of the board of pharmacy. OAG 11-47, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 49 (5/19/11).

63-1-133. Director — Member of agencies.

The director of the division or the director's duly authorized representative shall be an ex officio, nonvoting member of each agency attached to this division and shall be entitled to attend all meetings of such agencies.

All agencies attached to this division shall advise the director of any meeting at which official action will be taken at least forty-eight (48) hours prior to such meeting unless the director expressly waives such requirement.

Acts 1971, ch. 81, § 7; T.C.A., §§ 53-123, 68-1-603.

63-1-134. Penalty for violation of statute, rule or order — Recovery.

With respect to any person required to be licensed, permitted or authorized by any board, commission or agency attached to the division of health related boards, each respective board, commission or agency may assess a civil penalty against such person in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each separate violation of a statute, rule or order pertaining to such board, commission or agency. Each day of continued violation constitutes a separate violation.

Each board, commission or agency shall by rule establish a schedule designating the minimum and maximum civil penalties that may be assessed under this section. In assessing civil penalties, the following factors may be considered:

Whether the amount imposed will be a substantial economic deterrent to the violator;

The circumstances leading to the violation;

The severity of the violation and the risk of harm to the public;

The economic benefits gained by the violator as a result of noncompliance; and

The interest of the public.

Civil penalties assessed pursuant to this section or any other section authorizing the assessment of civil penalties by any board, council or committee established in this title or title 68 that is attached to the department, unless otherwise provided by law, shall become final, due and payable on the date the order in which they are assessed becomes final pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5; provided however, that the boards, councils, committees or the department is authorized to order or enter into agreements for the payment of assessed civil penalties in installments that are due and payable beyond the date on which the assessment becomes final.

If the violator fails to pay an assessment when it becomes final or fails to pay according to the terms of an installment payment plan, the department, in addition to taking further action against the violator's license, may apply to the appropriate court for a judgment and seek execution of the judgment.

Jurisdiction for recovery of such penalties shall be in the chancery court of Davidson County or the chancery court of the county in which all or part of the violations occurred.

All sums recovered pursuant to this section shall be paid into the state treasury.

Acts 1989, ch. 389, § 2; 2007, ch. 196, § 1.

63-1-135. Expenditure estimates — Improvement recommendations.

Before submitting an estimate of its expenditure requirements as provided in § 9-4-5103, the department of health shall consult with each board, commission or agency that is attached to the division of health related boards created under § 68-1-101 and is authorized or required to collect any fees.

Any such board, commission or agency shall timely submit to the commissioner of health an itemized list of any improvements recommended for inclusion in the department's expenditure estimate.

In the preparation of such estimate, the department shall clearly indicate the disposition of each improvement recommendation received under this section.

The department shall transmit with its expenditure estimate a copy of each list of recommended improvements received under this section to the commissioner of finance and administration.

Acts 1989, ch. 523, § 181.

63-1-136. Additional powers and duties — Assistance to impaired health practitioners.

Regulatory boards, commissions and agencies attached to the division of health related boards, in addition to other enumerated powers and duties, have as their purpose assistance in the rehabilitation of impaired health practitioners who are licensed, certified or registered by the respective regulatory boards, commissions and agencies.

Regulatory boards, commissions and agencies attached to the division of health related boards, in addition to other enumerated powers and duties, have the power to enter into agreements, provide grants and make other arrangements with statewide nonprofit professional associations or their affiliated foundations to identify and assist impaired professionals who are licensed, registered or certified by the respective regulatory boards, commissions and agencies.

Regulatory boards, commissions and agencies attached to the division of health related boards have the authority to accept and designate grants, public or private financial assistance and licensure fees to fund programs authorized in subsection (b) to assist impaired professionals. The provision of such grants shall not deem recipient peer assistance programs to be the functional equivalent of the state.

All information, interviews, reports, statements, memoranda and other data furnished to a nonprofit professional association or its affiliated foundation and any findings, conclusions or recommendations resulting from the proceedings of such professional association or its affiliated foundation are privileged and confidential. The records of such proceedings of the affiliated foundation or association shall be used only in the exercise of proper functions of the regulatory board, commission or agency attached to the division of health related boards and shall not become public record nor be made available for court subpoena or discovery proceedings.

If a regulatory board, commission or agency attached to the division of health related boards determines that an association or its affiliated foundation is not providing adequate services under this section, then the board, commission or agency may contract with another nonprofit organization in order to assist impaired professionals.

Organizations that directly provide alcohol and drug treatment services or behavioral health services on an inpatient or outpatient basis for remuneration shall be prohibited from contracting with such board, commission or agency to provide a professional assistance program.

Acts 1992, ch. 541, § 1; 2003, ch. 388, §§ 1, 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 388, § 2 provided that nothing in the act, which amended subsections (b), (c) and (d) and added subsection (e) and (f), shall interfere with any existing contract.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

Attorney General Opinions. Applicability of procurement requirements when providing grants and entering into agreements to assist impaired professionals pursuant to T.C.A. § 63-1-136; applicability to grant contracts for peer assistance issued by health-related regulatory boards under T.C.A. § 63-1-136. OAG 14-98, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 101 (10/30/14).

63-1-137. Funds — Deposits and disbursements.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, all moneys other than the state regulatory fee as provided for in § 9-4-5117 collected by any board attached to the division of health related boards shall be deposited in the state general fund and credited to a separate account for each such board.

Disbursements from such accounts shall be made solely for the purpose of defraying expenses incurred in the implementation and enforcement of the board's area of regulation, including defraying costs to implement the Health Care Consumer Right-to-Know Act of 1998, compiled in chapter 51 of this title.

No such expenses shall be paid from any other state funds other than provided for in § 9-4-5117.

Funds remaining in board accounts at the end of any fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain available for expenditure in accordance with law.

Acts 1992, ch. 830, § 1; 1995, ch. 446, § 3; 1999, ch. 373, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Former subsection (e), concerning amounts remaining in board accounts on June 30, 1994, was deemed obsolete and was deleted by the code commission in 2004.

Compiler's Notes. Section 4-3-1011, referred to in (a) and (c), was transferred to § 9-4-5117 by Acts 2013, ch. 454, § 13, effective May 16, 2013.

Acts 2012, ch. 880, § 28 provided that, notwithstanding any provision of the law to the contrary, no funds maintained in any of the accounts created pursuant to § 63-1-137 shall be used to pay any of the expenses incurred in acquiring hardware, software, or contracted services or employing personnel needed to implement and enhance the operation of the controlled substance monitoring database pursuant to the provisions of Acts 2012, ch. 880.

63-1-138. Screening panels.

The division and each board, committee or council established in this title that does not already have authority to utilize screening panels and the medical laboratory board, the board of alcohol and drug counselors and the Tennessee emergency medical services board as established in title 68 may utilize one (1) or more screening panels in their investigative and disciplinary process to assure that complaints filed and investigations conducted are meritorious and to act as a mechanism for diversion to professional peer review organizations and/or impaired professionals associations or foundations of those cases that the boards, through established guidelines, deem appropriate.

The activities of the screening panels and any mediation or arbitration sessions shall not be construed as meetings of an agency for purposes of the open meetings law, compiled in title 8, chapter 44, and shall remain confidential. The members of the screening panels, mediators and arbitrators have a deliberative privilege and the same immunity as provided by law for the boards and are not subject to deposition or subpoena to testify regarding any matter or issue raised in any contested case, criminal prosecution or civil lawsuit that may result from or be incident to cases processed before them.

The screening panel has the authority to administer oaths to witnesses. Any documents or records produced at the screening panel shall be exempt from the public records law, compiled in title 10, chapter 7, until there is a filing of a notice of charges and such documents or records form the basis for such filing of a notice of charges.

Members of a screening panel may be drawn from among the membership of the relevant board, or members may be appointed by the relevant board. Nonboard members shall meet the requirements of membership for the relevant board and may include a consumer member. A board member serving on a panel shall not participate in a contested case involving any matter heard by the panel.

Each screening panel shall be instructed as to the statutes, rules, regulations and philosophies of the relevant board as it pertains to disciplinary action and to the procedures to be followed by the panels. Each screening panel shall be provided a copy of Rule 31 of the Rules of the Tennessee Supreme Court for review by members of the screening panel for general guidance as to the principles of mediation and alternative dispute resolution.

A board does not have authority to compel any party to participate in a screening panel, and no prejudice will be incurred if the party chooses not to participate or to accept the offer of the screening panel.

Acts 2001, ch. 322, § 1; 2005, ch. 234, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-1-138 (Acts 1994, ch. 803, § 1), concerning games of the XXVIth Olympiad and the Xth Paralympiad, was repealed by Acts 1994, ch. 803, § 1, effective December 31, 1996.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.